Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202573-1103
Act; purpose; applicability.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the purpose of the State Building Construction Alternatives Act is to provide each authorized agency with alternative methods of contracting for state buildings for which the authorized agency has responsibility.

(2) The alternative methods of contracting shall be available to each authorized agency for use on any project regardless of the funding source. An authorized agency may enter into a construction manager-general contractor contract only if the total cost of the project is more than thirty million dollars. The State Building Construction Alternatives Act shall govern the design-build and construction manager-general contractor procurement processes for authorized agencies.

(3) The State Building Construction Alternatives Act does not apply to projects to which the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act, the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, or the Transportation Innovation Act apply. The State Building Construction Alternatives Act does not apply to the University of Nebraska or the state colleges.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 3.

Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act, see section 61-501.

State Park System Construction Alternatives Act, see section 37-1701.

Transportation Innovation Act, see section 39-2801.